Utah statutes.
59-2-1343.   Tax Sale Listing.
If any property is not redeemed by March 15 following the lapse of four years
from the date  when the property tax became delinquent, the county treasurer
shall immediately file a listing with the county auditor of all properties
whose redemption period is expiring in the nearest forthcoming  tax sale.  The
listing is known as the "Tax Sale Listing."
